Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201144-4223
Selection of pool administrator; procedure.

(1) The board shall select a
pool administrator through a competitive bidding process to administer
the pool. The pool administrator
may be an insurer or a third-party administrator authorized to transact business
in this state. The board shall evaluate bids submitted on the
basis of criteria established by the board which shall include:

(a) The applicant's proven ability
to handle individual sickness and accident insurance;

(b) The efficiency of the applicant's claim-paying procedures;

(c) The applicant's estimate of total
charges for administering the pool;

(d) The applicant's ability to administer
the pool in a cost-effective manner;
and

(e) The applicant's
ability to negotiate reduced health care provider reimbursement rates for
benefits payable under pool coverage for covered services.

(2) The pool administrator shall
serve for a period of three years subject to removal for cause. At least one
year prior to the expiration of each three-year period of service by a pool administrator, the
board shall invite all insurers and
third-party administrators authorized to transact business in this state,
including the current pool administrator, to
submit bids to serve as the pool administrator for
the succeeding three-year period. Selection of the pool administrator for the succeeding period
shall be made at least six months prior to the end of the current three-year
period.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 23;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 37;

Laws 2011, LB73, § 4.